Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.240

Abortion—Right to medical treatment of infant born alive.

The right of medical treatment of an infant born alive in the course of an abortion procedure shall be the same as the right of an infant born prematurely of equal gestational age.

[ 1981 c 328 s 1.]